Florida, session 2026, SB578.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 430.5016, Florida Statutes, is created 17 to read: 18 430.5016âAlzheimerâs Disease Awareness Initiative.â 19 (1)âThe Department of Elderly Affairs shall contract for 20 the development and implementation of the Alzheimerâs Disease 21 Awareness Initiative. The initiative must provide an opportunity 22 for residents affected by Alzheimerâs disease and related forms 23 of dementia to benefit from greater support and to obtain 24 information that is validated in national research. 25 (2)âThe initiative must, at a minimum: 26 (a)âInclude a website and other related electronic 27 resources that will address all of the following: 28 1.âThe advantages of early detection and diagnosis. 29 2.âHow to reduce risk factors. 30 3.âThe importance of brain health. 31 4.âThe importance of talking to a professional about being 32 screened and assessed for Alzheimerâs disease and related forms 33 of dementia. 34 5.âHow to promote healthy aging. 35 6.âRecent progress in Alzheimerâs research and the 36 availability of clinical trials. 37 7.âCommunity resources available for those affected by 38 Alzheimerâs disease and related forms of dementia. 39 8.âAny related topic deemed appropriate by the department. 40 (b)âUse the Department of Elderly Affairsâ Alzheimerâs 41 Disease and Related Dementias Resource Guide as a part of the 42 initiative materials. 43 (c)âPromote health care provider education in partnership 44 with the Department of Health to help improve care and services 45 for patients with Alzheimerâs disease and related forms of 46 dementia in accordance with s. 381.825. 47 (d)âUse varied forms of advertising for public events, 48 including, but not limited to, print advertising, digital 49 advertising, and advertising on social media platforms. 50 (e)âInclude a statewide mobile in-person outreach program 51 that prioritizes those in underserved communities and provides 52 information on issues relating to Alzheimerâs disease and 53 related forms of dementia, including, but not limited to, brain 54 health, risk education, early detection, and diagnosis. The 55 program may also provide referrals to the department and provide 56 information regarding any available community resources relating 57 to Alzheimerâs disease and related forms of dementia. 58 (3)(a)âThe entity with which the department contracts to 59 develop and implement the Alzheimerâs Disease Awareness 60 Initiative must be a statewide nonprofit organization that: 61 1.âHas a history of focusing on care and support for those 62 affected by Alzheimerâs disease and related forms of dementia, 63 including providing online resources to caregivers and people 64 living with the disease and through community-based events and 65 supporting Alzheimer disease research; and 66 2.âHas the organizational capacity to manage a statewide 67 initiative and successfully carry out the requirements of this 68 section. 69 (b)âThe entity shall collaborate with other relevant state 70 agencies and private organizations to develop and implement the 71 initiative. Such agencies shall collaborate with the entity to 72 carry out the initiative. 73 (4)âThe Alzheimerâs Disease Advisory Committee shall 74 annually evaluate the effectiveness of the initiative and make 75 recommendations to the department and the Legislature concerning 76 the need for future funding for the Alzheimerâs Disease 77 Awareness Initiative each year as a part of the advisory 78 committeeâs annual report. 79 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.